Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-317
Commission; disseminate information and promotional materials.

The commission may disseminate information and promotional materials regarding the state park system and the wildlife resources of the state in order to inform the public of the outdoor recreation opportunities to be found in Nebraska.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 75;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 5.